Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB76.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 431 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Administratively released" means the pretrial release of a defendant by
pretrial services pursuant to rules or orders issued by the Supreme Court;
(b) "Jail" has the same meaning as in KRS 441.005;
(c) "Law enforcement agency" has the same meaning as in KRS 61.298; and
(c) "Regional jail" has the same meaning as in KRS 441.005.
(2) (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a person shall not be:
1. Considered a verified and eligible defendant under KRS 431.066;
2. Released from custody on his or her own recognizance or bail; or
3. Administratively released;
until he or she can provide proof that he or she is a citizen of the United
States or otherwise lawfully permitted to be in the United States.
(b) A law enforcement agency, jail, or regional jail that has custody of a person
who cannot provide proof of citizenship or permission to be in the United
States shall immediately notify the United States Department of Homeland
Security to determine if the person is:
1. A citizen of the United States;
2. Lawfully permitted to be in the United States; or
3. Subject to a United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement
detainer.
(3) (a) A person shall not remain in custody under subsection (2) of this section
longer than forty-eight (48) hours, after which the person shall be eligible to
be released from custody on his or her own recognizance or bail under this
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 11/18/2025 3:57 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 145
chapter.
(b) Any pretrial risk assessment completed for a person eligible to be released
under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall consider the fact that the
person cannot provide proof that he or she is a citizen of the United States
or otherwise lawfully permitted to be in the United States when determining
if the person is a flight risk, is unlikely to appear for trial, or is likely to be a
danger to the public if released.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 11/18/2025 3:57 PM Jacketed